Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Article 5. Obedience to and Effect of Traffic Laws.

§ 63-3-201.
Offenses and penalties generally.

It is unlawful and, unless otherwise declared in this title with respect to particular offenses, it is a misdemeanor for any person to do any act forbidden by this chapter or to fail to perform any act required in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8146; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-203.
Failure or refusal to comply with order or direction of police officer.

No person shall wilfully fail or refuse to comply with any lawful order or direction of any police officer invested by law with authority to direct, control, or regulate traffic.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8147; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-205.
Applicability of chapter to various public officers and employees.

The provisions of this chapter applicable to the drivers of vehicles upon the highways shall apply to the drivers of all vehicles owned or operated by the United States, this state or any county, city, town, district, or any other political subdivision of the state, subject to such specific exceptions as are set forth in this chapter with respect to authorized emergency vehicles.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to persons, teams, motor vehicles and other equipment while actually engaged in work upon the surface of a highway but shall apply to such persons and vehicles when traveling to or from such work.

No driver of any authorized emergency vehicle shall assume any special privilege under this chapter except when such vehicle is operated in response to an emergency call or in the immediate pursuit of an actual or suspected violator of the law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8148; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-207.
Applicability of chapter to persons riding bicycles or animals or driving animal-drawn vehicles.

Every person riding a bicycle or an animal or driving any animal drawing a vehicle upon a highway shall have all of the rights and all of the duties applicable to the driver of a vehicle under this chapter, except those provisions of this chapter which by their nature can have no application.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8149; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1983, ch. 350, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 63-3-208.
Use of electric personal assistive mobility devices allowed on highways and sidewalks; restrictions.

An electric personal assistive mobility device as defined in Section 63-3-103, may be operated:

On a marked bicycle path;

On any street or road where bicycles are permitted; or

On a sidewalk, if the person operating the device yields the right-of-way to pedestrians and gives an audible signal before overtaking and passing a pedestrian.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2003, ch. 485, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2003.

§ 63-3-209.
Uniformity of application of chapter throughout state; local traffic regulation generally.

The provisions of this chapter shall be applicable and uniform throughout this state and in all political subdivisions and municipalities therein, and no local authority shall enact or enforce any rule or regulation in conflict with the provisions of this chapter unless expressly authorized herein. Local authorities may, however, adopt additional traffic regulations which are not in conflict with the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8150; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-210.
Prohibition of operation of motor scooters rented in accordance with Section 63-1-6.1 on certain roads or highways under certain circumstances.

The Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning may, in accordance with Section 37-105-1, enact rules and regulations that prohibit the operation of motor scooters, which are rented in accordance with Section63-1-6.1, on certain roads or highways, if the board deems the prohibition to be in the interest of public safety.

The governing board of any municipality may enact rules and regulations that prohibit the operation of motor scooters, which are rented in accordance with Section63-1-6.1, on certain roads or highways, if the board deems the prohibition to be in the interest of public safety.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 464, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 63-3-211.
Enactment of traffic regulations by local authorities.

The provisions of this chapter shall not be deemed to prevent local authorities with respect to streets and highways under their jurisdiction and within the reasonable exercise of the police power from-

1. Regulating the standing or parking of vehicles;

2. Regulating traffic by means of police officers or traffic control signals;

3. Regulating or prohibiting processions or assemblages on the highways;

4. Designating particular highways as one-way highways and requiring that all vehicles thereon be moved in one specific direction;

5. Regulating the speed of vehicles in public parks;

6. Designating any highway as a through highway and requiring that all vehicles stop before entering or crossing the same or designating any intersection as a stop intersection and requiring all vehicles to stop at one or more entrances to such intersections;

7. Restricting the use of highways as authorized in Chapter 5 of this title.

No ordinance or regulation enacted under subdivision 4, 5, 6, or 7 of this section shall be effective until signs giving notice of such local traffic regulations are posted upon or at the entrances to the highway or part thereof affected as may be most appropriate.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8151; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-212.
Localities prohibited from enacting ordinances restricting cell phone use in motor vehicles.

No county, municipality or other political subdivision shall enact any ordinance restricting the use of cellular phones in any motor vehicle until such time as the state may authorize a county, municipality or other political subdivision to enact such an ordinance.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2002, ch. 491, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 63-3-213.
Effect of chapter upon rights of owners of certain real property.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent the owner of real property used by the public for purposes of vehicular travel by permission of the owner and not as a matter of right from prohibiting such use, or from requiring other or different or additional conditions than those specified in this chapter, or otherwise regulating such use as may seem best to such owner.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8152; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.